Utah statutes.
17B-1-609.   Hearing to consider adoption.

(1)  At the meeting at which the tentative budget is adopted, the board of trustees shall:

(a)  establish the time and place of a public hearing to consider its adoption; and

(b)  order that notice of the hearing:

(i) (A)  be published at least seven days before the hearing in at least one issue of a newspaper of general circulation published in the county or counties in which the district is located; or

(B)  if no newspaper is published, be posted in three public places within the district; and

(ii)  be published at least seven days before the hearing on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701.

(2)  If the budget hearing is held in conjunction with a tax increase hearing, the notice shall be published in accordance with the advertisement provisions of Section 59-2-919.

